California statutes. Water Code
Projects shall be undertaken and completed in accordance with the approved project plans. Project works may be undertaken by the department or, at the department’s option, by the local public agency pursuant to an agreement with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.

In addition to any obligations assumed under an agreement with the department and to the extent consistent with that agreement, the local public agency shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide construction access to lands or rights-of-way which it owns or maintains for flood control purposes or for purposes with which the project’s required uses are compatible and necessary to complete the project.

(b) Maintain the completed project pursuant to maintenance criteria developed and adopted in accordance with Section 12984.

(c) Apply for federal disaster assistance, whenever eligible, under Public Law 93-288.

(d) Hold and save the department, any other agency or department of the state, and their employees free from any and all liability for damages, except that caused by gross negligence, that may arise out of the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project.

(e) Acquire easements from the crown along levees for the control and reversal of subsidence in areas where the department determines that such an easement is desirable to maintain structural stability of the levee. The easement shall (1) restrict the use of the land to open-space uses, nontillable crops, the propagation of wildlife habitat, and other compatible uses, (2) provide full access to the local agency for levee maintenance and improvement purposes, and (3) allow the owner to retain reasonable rights of ingress and egress as well as reasonable rights of access to the waterways for water supply and drainage. The local public agency costs of acquisition of the easements shall be reimbursable by the department from moneys appropriated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12300 or any sources of funding appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this part.

(f) Comply with all habitat mitigation and improvement requirements pursuant to this part.

(g) Use subsidence control alternatives, where appropriate, to reduce long-term maintenance and improvement costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12318.

(a) The Resources Agency may establish a team of federal, state, and local agencies, and other persons or entities with a stake in finding a solution to the problems of the delta levees, to develop recommendations for the beneficial reuse of dredged material, consistent with actions identified by the CALFED Bay-Delta Program as core actions, which are those actions included in all bay-delta solutions. The recommendations shall address all of the following needs:

(1) Long-term availability of cost-effective, environmentally safe, and appropriate dredged material for delta levee maintenance and improvements.

(2) Beneficial reuse of dredged or suitable alternative materials.

(3) Coordination of dredging projects to augment on-island stockpiles.

(4) Development of a comprehensive monitoring program of the effects of the reuse of dredged material.

(5) A study of the applicability and appropriateness of constructing channel sediment traps and dredged material rehandling facilities adjacent to frequently dredged channel sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.9. The Open and Transparent Water Data Act [12400. - 12420.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [12400. - 12402.]

12400.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Open and Transparent Water Data Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The recent drought reveals that California needs to integrate existing water and ecological data into an authoritative open-access platform to help water managers operate California’s water system more effectively and help water users make informed decisions based on water availability and allocation.

(b) State and federal leadership, increased awareness by business, governmental, and nongovernmental organizations through open and transparent access to data, and improved technology and availability of open-source platforms create a unique opportunity that
 California should seize upon to integrate and increase access to existing water data.

(c) California is working to increase access to water data collected by state agencies. The state board is piloting a project to make water quality datasets available online through an open data portal. The portal creates an opportunity to foster collaboration among state agencies, share and integrate existing datasets, improve state agency operations through data-driven decisionmaking, and improve transparency and accountability.

(d) State agencies should promote openness and interoperability of water data. Making information accessible, discoverable, and usable by the public can foster entrepreneurship, innovation, and scientific discovery.

(e) Water data and information technology tools and applications developed and gathered using state funds should be made publicly accessible. State delegation of data management to contractors should not result in the public losing access to its own information.

(f) The availability of open-source tools makes it easier to access and explore water and ecological data and could facilitate the creation of an online integrated water data platform without the need to create an expensive new centralized database.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part: 

(a) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(b) “Metadata” means data that describes data.

(c) “Platform” means the statewide integrated water data platform described in Section 12415.

(d) “State board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Statewide Water Data Integration [12405. - 12415.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12405. - 12406.]

12405.

The department, the state board, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall coordinate and integrate existing water and ecological data from local, state, and federal agencies. The purposes for integrating water and ecological data include, but are not limited to, providing adequate information to implement the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720)),
 improving the management of the state’s water resources, and bringing greater transparency to water transfers and the market.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12406.

(a) The department, in consultation with the California Water Quality Monitoring Council, the state board, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall develop protocols for data sharing, documentation, quality control, public access, and promotion of open-source platforms and decision support tools related to water data. The
 department shall develop and submit to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and by January 1, 2018, a report describing these protocols. The report shall be developed in collaboration with the California Water Quality Monitoring Council, the state board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, relevant federal
 agencies, and interested stakeholders, including, but not limited to, technology and open data experts and water data users.

(b) Recipients of state funds through grants or contracts for research or projects relating to the improvement of water or ecological data
 shall, as a condition of the receipt of a grant or contract, adhere to the protocols developed pursuant to subdivision (a) for data sharing, transparency, documentation, and quality control.

(c) A grant or contract recipient that does not comply with subdivision (b) is not eligible for state funding until the grant or contract recipient
 complies with those requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statewide Integrated Water Data Platform Creation [12410. - 12410.]

12410.

(a) The department, in consultation with the California Water Quality Monitoring Council, the state board, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall create, operate, and maintain a statewide integrated water data platform in accordance with Section 12415 and the following schedule:

(1) By January 1, 2018, the department shall do both of the following:

(A) Make public the protocols developed pursuant to Section 12406.

(B) Publish a strategic plan for data management to guide the implementation of this part.

(2) By April 1, 2018, the department shall release any request for proposals necessary for the development of a statewide integrated water data platform.

(3) (A) By September 1, 2019, the department shall make available existing water and ecological data held by state agencies on the platform.

(B) The department shall quarterly add the information described in subparagraph (A) not
 available as of September 1, 2019, that becomes available at a later date.

(4) (A) By August 1, 2020, the department shall make available on the platform available water and ecological data related to California water supply and management that is held by the following agencies:

(i) The United States Bureau of Reclamation.

(ii) The United States Fish and Wildlife Service.

(iii) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.

(iv) The United States Geological Survey.

(v) The United States Forest Service.

(B) The department shall
 quarterly add the information described in subparagraph (A) not available as of August 1, 2020, that becomes available at a later date.

(5) By August 1, 2020, the department shall make available on the platform any other existing information listed in Section 12415.

(b) The department may partner with an existing nonprofit organization, with a new nonprofit organization that the department creates, organized under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or with another state agency to create, operate, or maintain, or any combination thereof, the platform.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (a), the department may enter into an agreement with an existing nonprofit organization, with a new nonprofit organization that the department creates, organized under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or with another state agency for that nonprofit organization or state agency to create, operate, or maintain, or any combination thereof, the platform.

(d) The Department of Technology is deemed to have delegated to the department any authority over the implementation of this part granted to it pursuant to Section 11546 of the Government Code.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prevent a state agency from disseminating, managing, or publishing data separately from the platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Statewide Integrated Water Data Platform Features [12415. - 12415.]

12415.

The statewide integrated water data platform created pursuant to Section 12410 shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(a) Integrate existing water and ecological data information from multiple autonomous databases managed by federal, state, and local agencies and academia using consistent and standardized formats.

(b) Integrate the following
 datasets, as available:

(1) The department’s information on State Water Project reservoir operations, groundwater use, groundwater levels,
 urban water use, and land use.

(2) The state board’s data on water rights, water diversions, and water quality through California Environmental Data Exchange Network (CEDEN).

(3) The Department of Fish and Wildlife’s information on fish abundance and distribution.

(4) The United States Geological Survey’s streamflow conditions information through the National Water Information System.

(5) The United States Bureau of Reclamation’s federal Central Valley Project operations information.

(6) The United States Fish and Wildlife Service’s, United States Forest Service’s, and
 National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Fisheries’ fish abundance information.

(c) Provide data on completed water transfers and exchanges, including publicly available or voluntarily provided data on the volume, price, and delivery method, identity of the buyers and sellers, and the water right associated with the transfer or exchange.

(d) Provide documentation of data quality and data formats through metadata.

(e) Adhere to data protocols developed by state agencies pursuant to Section 12406.

(f) Be able to receive both spatial and time series data from various
 sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Water Data Administration Fund [12420. - 12420.]

12420.

(a) The Water Data Administration Fund is hereby created. All moneys in the fund are available, upon appropriation, to the department, the state board, or the Department of Fish and Wildlife for the collection, management, and improvement of water
 and ecological data for the purposes of this part.

(b) The Department of Finance shall develop a standardized agreement to allow for the voluntary donation to the fund by any person, educational institution, government entity, corporation or other business entity, or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. THE COLORADO RIVER BOARD OF CALIFORNIA [12500. - 12565.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [12500. - 12503.]

12500.

The definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

“Board” means the Colorado River Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

“Commissioner” means the Colorado River Commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12503.

“Fund” means the Colorado River Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Board [12510. - 12519.]

12510.

There is in the state government, in the Resources Agency, the Colorado River Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.

The board consists of eight members appointed by the Governor as provided in this chapter, two of whom shall be public members appointed by the Governor, and the Director of Water Resources and the Director of Fish and Game or their designees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12512.

The governing bodies of the San Diego County Water Authority, Palo Verde Irrigation District, Imperial Irrigation District, Coachella Valley Water District, the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, and the Department of Water and Power of the City of Los Angeles shall each submit to the Governor two lists of not less than three persons on each with a recommendation as to whom should be appointed from one list as its member on the board and from the other list as its alternate on the board. The Governor shall appoint each agency’s member and alternate from the designated lists. If, after 60 days following submission of the initial or any new list, the Governor has not made an appointment, the person recommended by the governing body shall be deemed appointed. Each governing body if it desires to have a new member or alternate, or both, may submit new lists at any time. A member of the governing body of an agency may be appointed as a member of the board or as an alternate. Each alternate shall, in the absence of the appointed member for any cause, including vacancy in the office of the appointed member, have all the authority and rights of the member to which he or she is an alternate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1019, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12513.

Each member of the board, except as otherwise provided in this section, shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of his duties. In addition, each member of the board that is neither eligible for nor receives any salary or other compensation for time spent attending meetings of the board shall receive fifty dollars ($50) for each day attending the meetings of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

12514.

(a) The board shall determine, by majority vote, where to maintain its office and shall hold meetings at that office or elsewhere upon call of the chairman or three members of the board. The board shall not relocate its office more than once within each gubernatorial term.

(b) The local agencies that are represented on the board may reimburse employees of the board for relocation or net commuting expenses, or both, incurred by those employees as the result of a change in the location of the office pursuant to subdivision (a). The costs shall be divided equally among the local agencies. Any commuting expenses shall not exceed the state’s reimbursement rate for state employees. Any relocation benefits shall be approved by each local agency prior to those benefits being offered to board staff.

(c) Any payments made pursuant to subdivision (b) do not constitute income for the purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 82030 of the Government Code, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12515.

All of the records of the board or copies of them shall be maintained at its office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12516.

The board shall be subject to the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.

The board shall adopt such rules or procedure as may be required for the orderly disposition of its business and such regulations as may be necessary in order to carry out the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12518.

The board shall make such reports and recommendations to the Governor as he requires or as the board deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12519.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, the board may hold executive sessions in conjunction with any regular or special meeting and maintain confidential information and records limited to matters concerning interstate claims to the use of Colorado River system waters in judicial proceedings, administrative proceedings, and negotiations with representatives from other states or the federal government. Whenever the board holds an executive session in conjunction with any regular or special meeting or maintains as confidential any information or records hereunder, the board shall make an affirmative finding in its public minutes that the holding of an open meeting or the disclosure of the information or records to the public would substantially impair the performance by the board of its statutory duties. At the end of the minutes of each meeting of the board shall appear the certificate of its executive secretary that the meeting was held in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Sections 12516 and 12519 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Commissioner [12525. - 12533.]

12525.

The board shall elect from among its members, other than the Director of Water Resources or the Director of Fish and Game or their designees, a chairman who is ex officio the “Colorado River Commissioner.” The chairman shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 564, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12526.

The commissioner shall serve without compensation, but he shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of his duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12527.

The commissioner shall perform the duties imposed upon him by this chapter under the direction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12528.

The commissioner shall consult and advise with the board in exercising the powers and performing the duties enumerated in this chapter and make such reports and recommendations as he deems proper or as the board requests, to the end that the rights and interests of the State, its agencies and citizens, in, to, and in respect of, the water of the Colorado River System and the use thereof may be properly safeguarded and protected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12529.

The commissioner shall exercise on behalf of the State every right and power granted to the State or to any representative of it by Section 16 of the act of Congress designated the “Boulder Canyon Project Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12530.

The commissioner shall investigate past, present, and potential uses of the water of the Colorado River System within and without the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12531.

The commissioner shall investigate, coordinate, collate, and preserve information, facts, and data bearing upon the claims of all States and of all public or private agencies within and without the State to and in respect of the water and the use of water of the Colorado River System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12532.

The commissioner shall confer with representatives of other States in the Colorado River basin, representatives of the United States, and others concerning problems and measures relating to the development of the Colorado River basin, the use of the water of the Colorado River System, and the protection of the interests therein of the State and of the United States, and shall negotiate respecting such problems and measures and discuss the same and formulate and recommend to the Governor and the Legislature measures, agreements, and legislation deemed for the benefit of the State and the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12533.

The commissioner shall do and perform all other things deemed necessary or expedient to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Employees [12540. - 12541.]

12540.

From a list of not less than two persons submitted to it by the commissioner, the board shall appoint an executive director, whose duties shall be as required by the commissioner and by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12541.

The board may fix the compensation of the executive director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The Colorado River Fund [12550. - 12552.]

12550.

All irrigation districts, county water districts, municipal water districts, metropolitan water districts, county water authorities, water conservation districts, and flood control districts, may make such contributions to the Colorado River Fund as, in the exercise of the discretion of their respective governing bodies, is deemed advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 704.)
-------------------------------------------

12551.

The board may accept any and all contributions to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

12552.

All contributions accepted by the board shall be deposited by it in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Warrants [12553. - 12553.]

12553.

The State Controller shall draw warrants upon the fund from time to time upon demand of the commissioner, and the State Treasurer shall pay the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Colorado River Management Program [12560. - 12565.]

12560.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Account” means the Colorado River Management Account created pursuant to Section 12561.

(b) “California Plan” means the plan being developed by the Colorado River Board of California, the public agencies represented on that board, and the director to ensure that California can live within the state’s apportionment of Colorado River water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12561.

There is hereby created the Colorado River Management Account in the General Fund. Moneys in the account are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for use in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 22.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12562.

(a) (1) In furtherance of implementing and achieving the goals of the “California Plan,” the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in the account shall be used by the director to finance and arrange for lining portions of the All American Canal and the Coachella Branch of the All American Canal.

(2) The canal lining projects shall be completed not later than December 31, 2008, or such later date as may be required by extraordinary circumstances.

(3) The allocation of the water conserved from the canal lining projects and to be made available to the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California shall be consistent with federal law and shall be determined by an agreement among the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, the Imperial Irrigation District, the Palo Verde Irrigation District, the Coachella Valley Water District, and the San Luis Rey settlement parties, reached after consultation with the director and the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(b) (1) The sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) from the account shall be used by the director to finance the installation of recharge, extraction, and distribution facilities for groundwater conjunctive use programs necessary to implement the “California Plan.”

(2) Water stored in connection with the groundwater conjunctive use programs described in paragraph (1) shall be for the benefit of the member public agencies of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision limits the ability of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California to enter into agreements regarding the sharing of any water made available under this subdivision.

(c) The Legislature finds that the extension of the date from December 31, 2006, to December 31, 2008, for completing the canal project linings under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) during the 2003 portion of the 2003–04 Regular Session is required due to extraordinary circumstances. The Legislature finds that there have been unforeseen construction delays, contract award delays, and changed conditions requiring design modifications for lining the All American Canal and the Coachella Branch of the All American Canal, and that these circumstances are extraordinary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12563.

If the contingencies for a transfer to the San Diego County Water Authority of the conserved water under the water transfer agreement entered into by the Imperial Irrigation District and the San Diego County Water Authority on April 29, 1998, have not been satisfied in full prior to December 31, 2006, any recipient of the water made available under the agreement described in subdivision (a) of Section 12562, other than the San Luis Rey settlement parties, shall pay to the state, if required by statute, a portion of the funding made available under subdivision (a) of Section 12562, in an amount to be determined by the statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12564.

Nothing in the contract anticipated by the memorandum of understanding entered into on August 12, 1998, by the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California and the San Diego County Water Authority shall affect the authority of the Legislature to allocate, by statute, or reallocate water if the contingencies for a transfer of the conserved water to the San Diego County Water Authority under the water transfer agreement entered into by the Imperial Irrigation District and the San Diego County Water Authority on April 29, 1998, have not been satisfied in full prior to December 31, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12565.

The two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) made available to the director pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12562 may be expended solely for the lining of the All American Canal and the Coachella Branch of the All American Canal and only if all of the following requirements have been met:

(a) The Salton Sea Authority commissions a study of seepage and subsurface inflows to the Salton Sea from the All American Canal and the Coachella Branch of the All American Canal, and that study is completed. The study shall determine the nature of subsurface and drainage canal water movements from the unlined canals to the Salton Sea and to existing adjacent wetlands, and shall quantify the amount of water that may be lost to the Salton Sea and to those wetlands due to the canal lining projects. The Salton Sea Science Subcommittee shall review the requests for proposals for the study and shall be consulted in selecting the contractor responsible for conducting the study.

(b) Environmental documentation and permits required by the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C.A. Sec. 4321 et seq.), and any other applicable state and federal environmental laws are approved and certified for the All American Canal Lining Project or the Coachella Branch Lining Project.

(c) Pursuant to its responsibilities as a trustee agency under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), the Director of Fish and Game makes a finding that a canal lining project that is the subject of a request for funding pursuant to this chapter will avoid or mitigate all significant effects of the project on fisheries and other wildlife. The finding shall be accompanied by a statement from the United States Secretary of the Interior certifying that measures for the replacement of incidental fish and wildlife values adjacent to the All American Canal and the Coachella Branch of the All American Canal foregone as a result of the lining of the canal, or the mitigation of resulting impacts on fish and wildlife resources from the construction of a new canal, or a portion thereof, meet the statutory requirements of Section 203(a)(2) of Public Law 100-675. These mitigation measures shall be on an acre-for-acre basis, based on ecological equivalency, and shall be implemented concurrent with the construction of the canal lining project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. WATER DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS [12570. - 12949.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. Investigation of Projects [12570. - 12634.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [12570. - 12570.]

12570.

Chapters 1 and 2 of this part shall be known and may be cited as “The State Water Resources Law of 1945.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [12571. - 12573.]

12571.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12573.

“Lands, easements and rights of way” includes lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located; lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements and rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads; and including the cost of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by such channel improvements and rectifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Declarations of Policy [12578. - 12586.]

12578.

It is hereby declared that the people of the State have a primary interest in the control and conservation of flood waters, prevention of damage by flood waters, the washing away of river and stream banks by floods, and in the determination of the manner in which flood waters shall be controlled for the protection of life and property and the control, storage, and use of the State’s water resources in the general public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12579.

It is hereby declared that recurrent floods on streams and rivers, and other waterways of the State, causing loss of life and property, disruption of commerce, interruption of transportation and communications, and wasting of water, are detrimental to the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State. The control, storage and full beneficial use of flood waters, and the prevention of damage by flood waters, and the washing away of river and stream banks by floods are proper functions and activities of the State, in cooperation with counties, cities, state agencies and public districts, and in cooperation with the United States, or any of its departments or agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12580.

It is further declared that the State should engage in the study and coordination of all water development projects, including flood control projects, undertaken by counties, cities, state agencies and public districts, and the United States or any of its departments or agencies in order that such allocations and appropriations as are made by the State Legislature for such purposes will be expended upon those projects which are most beneficial to the State, and which will bring maximum benefits to the people of the State from the expenditure of public funds, and also that the State should participate in the construction of flood control works and projects and render beneficial aid thereto, when the benefits are in excess of the estimated cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12581.

In studying water development projects, full consideration shall be given to all beneficial uses of the State’s water resources, including irrigation, generation of electric energy, municipal and industrial consumption of water and power, repulsion of salt water, preservation and development of fish and wildlife resources, and recreational facilities, but not excluding other beneficial uses of water, in order that recommendations may be made as to the feasibility of such projects and for the method of financing feasible projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12582.

Fish and wildlife values, both economic and recreational, shall be given consideration in any flood control or water conservation program. In the design, construction, and operation of projects, when engineering and economic features of the project make it practicable, adequate provisions shall be made for the protection of migratory fishes, and the designs for structures and facilities required for such protection shall be prepared in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and the California Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12582.5.

Recreational uses, such as walkways, pathways, access points and view areas, shall be given consideration in any flood control or water conservation program. In the design, construction and operation of projects, when engineering and economic features of the project make it practicable, adequate provisions shall be made for such public recreational uses. The design of the areas and facilities for such uses shall be prepared in cooperation with the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 979.)
-------------------------------------------

12582.7.

(a) A flood management project that receives financial assistance under this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) shall meet all of the following requirements prior to state authorization:

(1) The project shall qualify for federal financial assistance under the requirements applicable to federal water resource development projects and shall be federally authorized. Projects may be authorized pursuant to a Chief Engineers’ report, but shall not be eligible for state financial assistance until authorized by Congress.

(2) The total annual benefit of providing protection from flood damages shall exceed the annual cost of the project allocable to flood management. The project shall be designed to produce the greatest feasible reduction in flood damages in the most efficient manner practicable, with due regard for environmental and recreational considerations, and local economic conditions.
